Utah statutes.
78A-6-301.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Custody" means the custody of a minor in the Division of Child and Family Services as of the date of disposition.

(2)  "Protective custody" means the shelter of a child by the Division of Child and Family Services from the time the child is removed from home until the earlier of:

(a)  the shelter hearing; or

(b)  the child's return home.

(3)  "Temporary custody" means the custody of a child in the Division of Child and Family Services from the date of the shelter hearing until disposition.

